District of Columbia statutes.
49-805

Commanding General authorized to make regulations.

The Commanding General, subject to the approval of the Commander-in-Chief, is authorized to make and publish regulations for the government of the militia in all matters not specifically provided for by law, conforming the same to the practice and regulations of the Army so far as they may be applicable.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 781, ch. 328, § 62
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 636, ch. 146, § 70
1973 Ed., § 39-905.
1981 Ed., § 39-905.